Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB667.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1156. Restrictions on Administrative Meetings During Instructional Time or Planning Periods.--(a) A teacher may not be required to attend an administrative meeting during a time that the teacher is otherwise scheduled to teach unless the teacher is relieved by another qualified teacher or a substitute teacher.(b) A teacher who is required to attend an administrative meeting during the teacher's planning period shall be entitled, 1234567891011121314151617181920 at the option of the school entity, to either compensatory time equal to the amount of time from the planning period that was diverted or additional time during the school day to replace the time that was diverted from the teacher's planning period.(c) A school entity may not schedule an administrative meeting in a manner that extends a teacher's working hours beyond what is required in the collective bargaining agreement between the school entity and the teacher.(d) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Planning period" shall mean a period of time during a school day which a teacher may use for professional duties, including instructional preparation and planning, communications with parents and legal guardians of students and evaluating student work."School entity" shall mean a school district, joint school district, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Teacher" shall mean an individual employed by a school entity to provide instruction to students.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0667PN0674 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021